updated/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ</alphabet>
<sdefs>

<sdef n="cat:n" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:p" c="Pronoun"/>
<sdef n="cat:v" c="verb"/>
<sdef n="cat:vn" c="verbal noun"/>
<sdef n="cat:adj" c="Adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:vj" c="Verbal Adjective"/>
<sdef n="cat:sh" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="cat:prsg" c="parsarg(ViBakwi-PostPosition)"/>
<sdef n="cat:cnj" c="conjunction"/>
<sdef n="cat:prawyaya" c="prawyaya"/>

<sdef n="gen:m" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="gen:f" c="feminine"/>

<sdef n="case:d" c="direct"/>
<sdef n="case:o" c="oblique"/>
<!-- <sdef n="case:Shashthi" c="shashthi"/> instead added parsarg:kA -->

<sdef n="parsarg:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ne" c="ne"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ko" c="ko"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:se" c="se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:ke" c="ke"/>
<!-- varshith 24 aug 2024-->
<sdef n="parsarg:ke pAsa" c="ke pAsa"/>

<sdef n="parsarg:meM" c="meM"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:meM_se" c="meM_se"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kA" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:kI" c="shashthi"/>
<sdef n="parsarg:para" c="para"/>

<sdef n="num:s" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="num:p" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="fnum:s" c="following noun singular"/>
<sdef n="fnum:p" c="following noun plural"/>

<sdef n="per:u" c="first"/>
<sdef n="per:m" c="second"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h0" c="second_honorific wu jA"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h1" c="second_honorific wuma jAo"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h2" c="second_honorific Apa jAyiye"/>
<sdef n="per:m_h" c="second_honorific"/>


<sdef n="per:a" c="third"/>
<sdef n="per:a_h1" c="third_honorific1"/>
<sdef n="per:a_h2" c="third_honorific2"/>

<sdef n="tam:adv_we_hue" c="adverbial we hue (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_wA_huA" c="adjective (kqxanwa) Rising sun"/>
<sdef n="tam:adj_yA_huA" c="adjective ed/en -- He is a changed person now -- "/>
<sdef n="tam:we_rahanA_hE" c="adverbial we_rahanA_hE (no change)"/>
<sdef n="tam:imper" c="imperative(AjFArWaka)"/>
<sdef n="tam:subj" c="subjunctive"/>
<sdef n="tam:nA" c="nA"/>
<sdef n="tam:wA" c="wA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA" c="yA"/>
<sdef n="tam:yA1" c="yA1"/>
<sdef n="tam:kara" c="kara"/>
<sdef n="tam:gA" c="gA"/>
<sdef n="tam:hE" c="hE"/>
<sdef n="tam:WA" c="WA"/>
<sdef n="tam:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="tam:ie" c="ie"/>
<sdef n="tam:o" c="o"/>
<sdef n="tam:iegA" c="iegA"/>
<sdef n="tam:e" c="e"/>
<sdef n="tam:Ai" c="Ai"/>
</sdefs>

<pardefs>

<pardef n="prawyaya">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prawyaya"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="parsarg">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prsg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="conjunct">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:cnj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="kyA/__p">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e> 
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>  

</pardef>
<!--added by Kirti Garg for LC project on Dec 7, 2022-->

<pardef n="vahAz/__p">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>


    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:ko" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

    <!--by varshith 05/09/24-->

    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:para" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>




</pardef>

<pardef n="kaba/__p">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="parsarg:0" /><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="per:a"/></r></p></e>

</pardef>

<e lm="kyA"><i>kyA</i><par n="kyA/__p"/></e>
<e lm="kaba"><i>kaba</i><par n="kaba/__p"/></e>
<e lm="kahAz"><i>kahAz</i><par n="kyA/__p"/></e>
<e lm="kis"><i>kis</i><par n="kyA/__p"/></e>
<e lm="kin"><i>kin</i><par n="kyA/__p"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_anusAra"><i>0~ke_anusAra</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_bAhara_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_bAhara_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWakA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_sAWakA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="kA~{swrI._e._na._ba.}"><i>kA~{swrI._e._na._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI_jagaha_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~kI_jagaha_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI~ora_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~kI~ora_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI_KAwira"><i>0~kI_KAwira</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{2_ba.}"><i>yA~WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>yA~hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{2_ba.}"><i>yA~WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{3_swrI._e.}"><i>yA~WA{3_swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM+yA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}"><i>nahIM+yA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~hE{1_ba.}"><i>yA~hE{1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~jEsA"><i>yA~jEsA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_meM_kA{swrI._e.}"><i>0~ke_meM_kA{swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="na+wA~huA{"><i>na+wA~huA{</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_WA{3_pu._ba.3_na._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_WA{3_pu._ba.3_na._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~nA"><i>0~nA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="se_nirAle_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>se_nirAle_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_parekA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_parekA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wakakA{pu._ba.}"><i>wakakA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kArana_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kArana_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_lie_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_lie_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_liye_mAwra{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_liye_mAwra{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_AsapAsakA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_AsapAsakA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAmanekA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_sAmanekA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_sAWa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWa_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_sAWa_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAmane_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_sAmane_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_samAna_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_samAna_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_padosameM"><i>0~ke_padosameM</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_lie_hE_jo-vaha{swrI._e.}"><i>0~ke_lie_hE_jo-vaha{swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_ulatA"><i>0~ke_ulatA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="future~{+hama}"><i>future~{+hama}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~sakawA_hE"><i>0~sakawA_hE</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_WA{2_swrI._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_WA{2_swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_binA_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_binA_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_viroXa_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_viroXa_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wA~AyA_hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>wA~AyA_hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~karawA_hE{13_e.1_ba.}"><i>yA~karawA_hE{13_e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~rahA_WA{2_ba.}"><i>0~rahA_WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}_nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}"><i>nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}_nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}"><i>wA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="vAlA"><i>vAlA</i><par n="prawyaya"/></e>
<e lm="Oura"><i>Oura</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="aWavA"><i>aWavA</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="vahAz"><i>vahAz</i><par n="vahAz/__p"/></e>
<e lm="yahAz"><i>yahAz</i><par n="vahAz/__p"/></e>
